src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! derivs
!LEXICON inen-lainenounDerivation
!i   nen-se-soun+ta-en-ia-ien-ten-iin ;
!lai nen-se-soun+ta-en-ia-ien-ten-iin ;
!
!LEXICON inen-läinenounDerivation
!i   nen-se-soun+ta-en-ia-ien-ten-iin ;
!läi nen-se-soun+ta-en-ia-ien-ten-iin ;
!
!LEXICON tse-llinen-sti-tar-tonounDerivations
!tse             ko-kaan+Adverb  ;
!lli             nen-se-soun+ta-en-ia-ien-ten-iin        ;
!llisuu          s-te-de-ks-toun+ta-en-ia-ien-iin        ;
!sti             ko-kaan+Adverb     ;
!t               ar-tare-taroun+ta-en-ia-ien-ten-iin   ;
!t               on-toma-tomoun+ta-an-ia-ien-(ten)-iin ;
!ttomuu          s-te-de-ks-toun+ta-en-ia-ien-iin     ;
!
!LEXICON itse-ittainounDerivations
!itse    ko-kaan+Adverb     ;
!ittain  ko-kaan+Adverb     ;
!
!LEXICON itse-ittäinounDerivations
!itse    kö-kään+Adverb     ;
!ittäin  kö-kään+Adverb     ;
!
! compounding
LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_0
0   PROPN_COMPOUND ;
+Cmp:   PROPN_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_N
0n:%>n               PROPN_COMPOUND    ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_IEN
0ien:%>i%>en                 PROPN_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_IDEN
0iden:%>i%>den                 PROPN_COMPOUND  ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_IN
0in:%>i%>n                 PROPN_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_ITTEN
0itten:%>i%>tten               PROPN_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_JEN
0jen:%>j%>en                 PROPN_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_TEN
0ten:%>ten                 PROPN_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND_S

+Cmp:»s	PROPN_COMPOUND ;



LEXICON PROPN_COMPOUND
+Use/Circ#:0#     NOUN   ;
!+Use/Circ#:0#     DeverbalNouns   ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PLNOM_ARCHAIC_CLIT

+Pl+Nom:%>t  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_BACK_PLNOM_ARCHAIC_POSS

+Pl+Nom:  PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

LEXICON PROPN_BACK_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC

+Pl+Nom:%>t  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:  PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Abe:%>tta  PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>lta  PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>lla  PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle  PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>sta  PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%>na  PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%>n  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:  PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>sen  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssa  PROPN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:  PROPN_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse  PROPN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi  PROPN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_FRONT_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC

+Pl+Nom:%>t  PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:  PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Abe:%>ttä  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>ltä  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>llä  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>stä  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%>nä  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%>n  PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:  PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill:%>sen  PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssä  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:  PROPN_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse  PROPN_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi  PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi  PROPN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CASES

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_PLURALS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_SINGULARS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT

+Foc/han:%>han	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>han%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/han+Qst:%>han%>ko	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>han%>pa	# ;

+Foc/kaan:%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaan%>han	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaan%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaan%>ko	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaan%>pa	# ;

+Foc/kin:%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>han	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>ko	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pa	# ;

+Qst:%>ko	# ;

+Qst+Foc/han:%>ko%>han	# ;

+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>ko%>kaan	# ;

+Qst+Foc/kin:%>ko%>kin	# ;

+Qst+Foc/pa:%>ko%>pa	# ;

+Qst+Foc/s:%>ko%>s	# ;

+Foc/pa:%>pa	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pa%>han	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pa%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pa%>kin	# ;

+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pa%>ko	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pa%>s	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT

:	# ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>de	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tte	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN

+Sg+Ill:a%>an	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:a%>a	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN

+Sg+Ill:e%>en	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:e%>e	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN

+Sg+Ill:%>han	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>ha	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON

+Sg+Ill:%>hon	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>ho	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN

+Sg+Ill:%>hun	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hu	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN

+Sg+Ill:i%>in	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:i%>i	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A

+Sg+Par:%>a	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA

+Pl+Par:%>i%>a	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA

+Pl+Par:%>i%>ta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA

+Pl+Par:%>j%>a	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA

+Sg+Par:%>ta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_PLURALS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>na	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Com:%>ine	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS

+Px3:%>nsa	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl1:%>mme	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl2:%>nne	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg1:%>ni	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg2:%>si	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN

+Px3:%>an	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN

+Px3:%>en	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM

+Sg+Nom:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_BACK_SINGULARS

+Pl+Nom:%>t	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abe:%>tta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>lta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>lla	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>sta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%>na	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%>n	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssa	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:	# ;

+Sg+Nom:%>	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Nom:%>	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

+Sg+Par:%>ta	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi	PROPN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_COMPOUND

+TruncPrefix:-	# ;

#:-	NOUN ;

#:-	PROPER ;

#:-	ADJECTIVE;

#:-	SUFFIX ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CASES

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_SINGULARS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT

+Foc/han:%>hän	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hän%>kään	# ;

+Foc/han+Qst:%>hän%>kö	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hän%>pä	# ;

+Foc/kaan:%>kään	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kään%>hän	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kään%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kään%>kö	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kään%>pä	# ;

+Foc/kin:%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>hän	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kään	# ;

+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>kö	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pä	# ;

+Qst:%>kö	# ;

+Qst+Foc/han:%>kö%>hän	# ;

+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kö%>kään	# ;

+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kö%>kin	# ;

+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kö%>pä	# ;

+Qst+Foc/s:%>kö%>s	# ;

+Foc/pa:%>pä	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pä%>hän	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pä%>kään	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pä%>kin	# ;

+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pä%>kö	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pä%>s	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT

:	# ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>de	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tte	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN

+Sg+Ill:e%>en	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:e%>e	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN

+Sg+Ill:%>hen	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>he	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN

+Sg+Ill:%>hin	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hi	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN

+Sg+Ill:%>hyn	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hy	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN

+Sg+Ill:%>hön	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>hö	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN

+Sg+Ill:i%>in	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:i%>i	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN

+Sg+Ill:ä%>än	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:ä%>ä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN

+Sg+Ill:ö%>ön	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:ö%>ö	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ

+Pl+Par:%>i%>tä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ

+Pl+Par:%>i%>ä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ

+Pl+Par:%>j%>ä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ

+Sg+Par:%>tä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä

+Sg+Par:%>ä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_PLURALS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Com:%>i%>ne	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS

+Px3:%>nsä	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl1:%>mme	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl2:%>nne	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg1:%>ni	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg2:%>si	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

:	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN

+Px3:%>en	PROPN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
